Arkansas, session 2025, SB343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(a)(3), concerning authorizations
and restrictions related to passenger motor vehicle limits of certain state
entities, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(144) Department of Shared Administrative Services 100

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-4-907 is amended to read as follows:
19-4-907. Motor vehicle records.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may Secretary of the Department
of Shared Administrative Services shall direct all state agencies to maintain
records with respect to all state-owned motor vehicles and may shall require
*LGL088*
04-03-2025 12:06:43 LGL088

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 H4/3/25 SB343
that the agencies file reports on the vehicles covering the operating costs
thereof.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 22-8-101 is amended to read as follows:
22-8-101. Registration of state-owned motor vehicles — Report.
(a)(1) In order that a complete inventory of all state-owned motor
vehicles is maintained, every state agency, including the Arkansas Department
of Transportation, the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the Division
of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas National Guard, and all constitutional
offices shall annually register each motor vehicle owned by the State of
Arkansas with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
in a manner prescribed by the secretary Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration.
(2) The registration shall include a description of each motor
vehicle, including the year, make, model, license number, vehicle
identification number, and other information which the secretary Secretary of
the Department of Finance and Administration might require.
(3)(b)(1) Whenever any state agency sells or disposes of a motor
vehicle, a complete record thereof shall be furnished to the secretary
Secretary of the Department of Shared Administrative Services as
authorization for the removal of the vehicle from the official state
inventory.
(4)(2) Whenever any state agency acquires a new or additional
motor vehicle, the information required by this subsection section to be
placed in the state inventory shall be furnished to the secretary Secretary
of the Department of Shared Administrative Services within ten (10) days
after the acquisition of the vehicle by the agency.
(5)(3) The secretary Secretary of the Department of Shared
Administrative Services shall keep the inventory of motor vehicles owned by
the State of Arkansas and its agencies current at all times, categorized in
accordance with the motor vehicles owned by each of the respective state
agencies.
(b)(1)(c)(1) The secretary Secretary of the Department of Shared
Administrative Services shall make an annual report to the Legislative
Council as to the number of motor vehicles owned by the State of Arkansas.
(2) The report shall include a comparison of the current
04-03-2025 12:06:43 LGL088

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 H4/3/25 SB343
inventory of motor vehicles with an inventory of the preceding year.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 22-8-105 is amended to read as follows:
22-8-105. Global positioning devices on certain state-owned vehicles —
Definition Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “global Global positioning device” means a device that can
access a global navigation satellite system or that uses radio frequency
information technology and provides reliable location and time information
and is capable of recording the travel and location of a vehicle.; and
(2)(A) "State-owned vehicles" means vehicles owned by cabinet-
level departments of the executive branch of state government.
(B) "State-owned vehicles" does not include vehicles that
are owned by a cabinet-level department of the executive branch of state
government and used for law enforcement.
(b)(1) A On or before January 1, 2028, a global positioning device may
shall be installed on a all state-owned vehicle vehicles at the direction of
the Department of Shared Administrative Services.
(2) Each state agency, board, or commission may shall keep
records of its state-owned vehicles' travels and locations as recorded by the
global positioning device and shall provide the department with access to
these records.
(c)(1) The records kept by a state agency, board, or commission under
this section are subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act
of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.
(2) However, disclosure shall not be made for the travels or
locations of any state-owned vehicle under this section until thirty (30)
days have elapsed after the travel or after the state-owned vehicle was at
the location.
(d) The records kept by a state agency, board, or commission under
this section are subject to audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit and shall be
kept for at least five (5) years.
(e) Each state agency, board, or commission that uses global
positioning devices on its vehicles The department may promulgate rules for
the implementation and administration of this section.

04-03-2025 12:06:43 LGL088

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 H4/3/25 SB343
SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 22-8-202 is amended to read as follows:
22-8-202. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to establish procedures for the
acquisition, disposal, and reassignment of automobiles and pickup trucks, as
those terms are defined in § 22-8-203, by the Department of Finance and
Administration Department of Shared Administrative Services of automobiles
and pickup trucks, as defined in § 22-8-203, to be acquired, owned, or
otherwise disposed of by certain state agencies, boards, commissions,
departments, and institutions of higher education.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 22-8-203(6), concerning definitions
pertaining to the Automobile and Pickup Truck Acquisition Act for the State
of Arkansas, is amended to read as follows:
(6) “State Vehicle Inventory and Control System” means an
automated system maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration
Department of Shared Administrative Services to record and control the size
and composition of the state's vehicle fleet and to accumulate historical
data on the costs associated with the vehicle fleet; and

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 22-8-205(b) and (c), concerning the
allocation of state agency vehicles, are amended to read as follows:
(b) From the information provided by state agencies requesting the
acquisition of automobiles or pickup trucks, the Department of Finance and
Administration Department of Shared Administrative Services shall prepare a
prioritized ranking for the then-current fiscal year based upon:
(1) Age of the vehicle to be replaced;
(2) Actual and projected mileage of the vehicle to be replaced;
(3) A history History of repair costs of the vehicle to be
replaced;
(4) Number and average age of each state agency's fleet of
vehicles; and
(5) Condition of state agency fleet and cost of maintenance of
its vehicles.
(c) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
Department of Shared Administrative Services, through the Marketing and
Redistribution Section, shall have the authority to may:
04-03-2025 12:06:43 LGL088

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 H4/3/25 SB343
(1) Establish criteria for reassigning reassign a vehicle from a
one (1) state agency to another state agency based upon need, age, condition,
utilization, and justification but not to decrease a state agency's actual
number of vehicles owned; and
(2) Reassign a vehicle from one (1) state agency to another
state agency pursuant to criteria established under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 22-8-209 is amended to read as follows:
22-8-209. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
Department of Shared Administrative Services, through his or her disbursing
officer, is authorized to may promulgate such rules as deemed necessary to
implement the provisions and intent of this subchapter, including rules
establishing fees for the use of state-owned vehicles by other state
agencies.

SECTION 9. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE.
Sections 2 through 8 of this act are effective on and after January 1,
2026.

/s/Irvin














04-03-2025 12:06:43 LGL088